en: Tool Safety Tethers
xx: Tool Safety Tethers
cs: Bezpečnostní lanka na nástroje
da: Stropper til værktøjssikring
de: Werkzeugsicherungen
es: Anclajes de seguridad para herramientas
fr: Longes de sécurité pour outils
it: Cordini di sicurezza per attrezzi
ja: 工具落下防止コード
nl: Gereedschapskoorden
no: Sikkerhetsstropper for verktøy
pl: Smycze na narzędzia
pt: Correias de segurança para ferramentas
ru: Стропы для инструментов
sv: Bälteshakar för verktyg
tr: Alet Güvenlik Bağları

en: Tool Sockets
xx: Tool Sockets
cs: Gola sady
da: Værktøjsmuffer
de: Steckschlüsseleinsätze
es: Casquillos para herramientas
fr: Douilles, Douille (outil de bricolage)
it: Prese per strumenti
ja: ソケット
nl: Dopsleutels
no: Verktøysokler
pl: Gniazda narzędziowe
pt: Soquetes para ferramentas
ru: Подставки для инструментов
sv: Verktygshylsor
tr: Alet Yuvaları

en: Tool Stands
xx: Tool Stands
cs: Pracovní stojany
da: Værktøjsholdere
de: Werkzeugständer
es: Soportes para herramientas
fr: Supports pour outils
it: Supporti per attrezzi
ja: 工具スタンド
nl: Gereedschapstandaarden
no: Verktøyreoler
pl: Stojaki na narzędzia
pt: Suportes para ferramentas
ru: Стеллажи для инструментов
sv: Verktygsställ
tr: Alet Stantları

en: Saw Stands
xx: Saw Stands
cs: Pilové stojany
da: Savholdere
de: Sägeständer
es: Soportes para sierras
fr: Supports pour scies
it: Supporti per seghe
ja: のこぎりスタンド
nl: Zaagstandaarden
no: Sagstativer
pl: Stojaki na piły
pt: Suportes para serras
ru: Подставки для пил
sv: Sågställ
tr: Testere Stantları

en: Wedge Tools
xx: Wedge Tools
cs: Klínové nástroje
da: Kiler
de: Keilwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas de cuña
fr: Coins
it: Cunei
ja: くさび工具
nl: Wiggen
no: Kileverktøy
pl: Kliny
pt: Ferramentas de cunha
ru: Клинообразные инструменты
sv: Kilverktyg
tr: Kamalama Araçları

en: Welding Accessories
xx: Welding Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro svařování
da: Svejsetilbehør
de: Schweißzubehör
es: Accesorios para soldaduras
fr: Accessoires de soudage
it: Accessori per saldatura
ja: 溶接工具
nl: Lasaccessoires
no: Sveisetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria spawalnicze
pt: Acessórios de soldagem
ru: Принадлежности для сварки
sv: Tillbehör för svetsning
tr: Kaynak Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Tools
xx: Tools
cs: Nářadí a nástroje
da: Redskaber, Værktøjer
de: Werkzeuge
es: Herramientas
fr: Outils
it: Utensili
ja: 工具
nl: Gereedschap
no: Verktøy
pl: Narzędzia
pt: Ferramentas
ru: Инструменты
sv: Verktyg
tr: Aletler

en: Abrasive Blasters
xx: Abrasive Blasters
cs: Pískovačky
da: Sandblæsere
de: Sandstrahler
es: Máquinas para pulir
fr: Sableuses
it: Sabbiatrici
ja: サンドブラスター
nl: Zandstralers
no: Sandblåsere
pl: Piaskarki
pt: Jateadores de areia
ru: Пескоструйные аппараты
sv: Sandblästrar
tr: Kumlama Makineleri

en: Anvils
xx: Anvils
cs: Kovadliny
da: Ambolte
de: Ambosse
es: Yunques
fr: Enclumes
it: Incudini
ja: 金床
nl: Aambeelden
no: Ambolter
pl: Kowadła
pt: Bigornas
ru: Наковальни
sv: Städ
tr: Örsler

en: Axes
xx: Axes
cs: Sekery
da: Økser
de: Äxte
es: Hachas
fr: Haches
it: Accette
ja: 斧
nl: Bijlen
no: Økser
pl: Siekiery
pt: Machados
ru: Топоры
sv: Yxor
tr: Baltalar

en: Carpentry Jointers
xx: Carpentry Jointers
cs: Srovnávačky
da: Afrettere – snedker
de: Tischlerbänke
es: Ensambladoras para madera
fr: Dégauchisseuses
it: Giunti per carpenteria
ja: 手押しカンナ
nl: Houtschaven
no: Avrettere til trearbeid
pl: Heblarki
pt: Plainas
ru: Плотницкие расшивки
sv: Fogjärn för snickeriarbete
tr: Rendeler

en: Carving Chisels & Gouges
xx: Carving Chisels & Gouges
cs: Řezbářské nástroje
da: Træskærerjern
de: Schnitzwerkzeuge & Hohlmeißel
es: Cinceles y escoplos
fr: Burins et gouges pour sculpture
it: Ceselli e scalpellini per intaglio
ja: 彫刻・カービング用具
nl: Houtsnijgereedschap
no: Meisler og huljern
pl: Narzędzia snycerskie
pt: Ferramentas para entalhe
ru: Инструменты для резьбы
sv: Snideriverktyg
tr: Oyma Aletleri

en: Caulking Tools
xx: Caulking Tools
cs: Tužlíky
da: Stemmeværktøjer
de: Stemmwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para calafatear
fr: Outils de calfat
it: Attrezzi da calafato
ja: コーキング用具
nl: Breeuwgereedschappen
no: Kalfatringsverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do uszczelniania
pt: Ferramentas para calafetagem
ru: Инструменты для заделки швов
sv: Drevningsverktyg
tr: Kalafat Aletleri

en: Chimney Brushes
xx: Chimney Brushes
cs: Komínové štětky
da: Skorstensbørster
de: Kaminbürste
es: Deshollinador
fr: Brosses de cheminée
it: Spazzole per camini
ja: 煙突用ブラシ
nl: Schoorsteenvegers
no: Skorsteinsbørster
pl: Szczotki do komina
pt: Escovas para chaminé
ru: Щётки для чистки дымоходов
sv: Skorstensborstar
tr: Baca Temizlik Fırçaları

en: Compactors
xx: Compactors
cs: Lisy
da: Komprimeringsmaskiner
de: Bodenverdichter
es: Compactadores
fr: Compacteurs
it: Compressori
ja: コンパクター
nl: Persen
no: Kompaktorer
pl: Ubijaki
pt: Compactadores
ru: Уплотнители
sv: Kompaktorer
tr: Sıkıştırıcılar

en: Compressors
xx: Compressors
cs: Kompresory
da: Kompressorer
de: Kompressoren
es: Compresores
fr: Compresseurs
it: Compattatori
ja: コンプレッサー
nl: Compressors
no: Kompressorer
pl: Kompresory
pt: Compressores
ru: Компрессоры
sv: Kompressorer
tr: Kompresörler

en: Concrete Brooms
xx: Concrete Brooms
cs: Hladicí kartáče na beton
da: Betonkoste
de: Betonbesen
es: Cepillos para suelos de cemento
fr: Balais à béton
it: Scope calcestruzzo
ja: コンクリートブラシ
nl: Betonbezems
no: Betongkoster
pl: Szczotki do betonu
pt: Vassouras para concreto
ru: Щётки для бетона
sv: Kvastar för betong
tr: Beton Süpürgeleri

en: Cutters
xx: Cutters
cs: Střihací a řezací nástroje
da: Arbejdssakse
de: Schneidegeräte
es: Cortadores
fr: Outils de coupe
it: Attrezzi per taglio
ja: カッター
nl: Snijwerktuigen
no: Kuttere
pl: Przecinaki
pt: Cortadores
ru: Режущие инструменты
sv: Skärare
tr: Kesiciler

en: Bolt Cutters
xx: Bolt Cutters
cs: Pákové kleště
da: Boltsakse
de: Bolzenschneider
es: Cortapernos
fr: Coupe-boulons
it: Tagliabulloni
ja: ボルトクリッパー
nl: Boutenscharen
no: Boltesakser
pl: Szczypce tnące przegubowe
pt: Corta-vergalhão
ru: Болторезы
sv: Bultsaxar
tr: Cıvata Keskileri

en: Glass Cutters
xx: Glass Cutters
cs: Řezače skla
da: Glasskærere
de: Glasschneider
es: Cortavidrios
fr: Coupe-verre
it: Tagliavetro
ja: ガラスカッター
nl: Glassnijder
no: Glasskjærere
pl: Przecinaki do szkła
pt: Cortadores de vidro
ru: Стеклорезы
sv: Glasskärare
tr: Cam Kesiciler